Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3960
Nebraska Dairy Industry Development Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Dairy Industry Development Fund is hereby created. Money in the fund shall be used for the administration of the Dairy Industry Development Act, including advertising and promotion, market research, nutrition and product research and development, and nutrition and educational programs. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 7.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.